Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.160

Examinations—Times and places—Meetings of board.

The board shall meet as often as may be necessary to carry out the duties of the board under this chapter. Examinations shall be administered at intervals not less than semiannually and at such times and places as may be determined by the board. There shall not be a limit upon the number of times a candidate may take the required examination.

[ 1984 c 279 s 71; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.